Utah statutes.
31A-25-201.   License and authority from insurers required.
(1)  A person may not perform, offer to perform, or advertise any service as a
third party administrator in Utah, without a valid license under Section
31A-25-203 and express authority from all insurers it represents.  A person
may not utilize the services of another as a third party administrator if he
knows or should know that the other does not have a license or the insurer
authority as required by law.  The commissioner shall be notified of the
commencement or termination of insurer authority in a form established by
rules.
(2)  The commissioner may by rule exempt certain persons or classes of persons
from the license requirement of Subsection (1) if the functions they perform
do not require the special competence, trustworthiness, or regulatory
surveillance made possible by licensing.
(3)  A contract is not invalid as a result of a violation of this section.
